test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tjerrut_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tjerrut: # Verb 'to bring' - ei tsekattu
     tjerrut+V+Inf: tjerrut

     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tjerruv
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tjerru
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tjerruja
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tjerrujin
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: tjerrubähttin #, tjerrubehten]  # Check!
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: tjerruba
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tjerrup
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tjerrubihttit #, tjerrubehtet]   # Check!
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tjerruji

     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tjerrujiv
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tjerruji
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tjerruj
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: tjerrujmin
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: tjerrujdin
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [tjerrujga, tjerrujgan]
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tjerrujme
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tjerrujde
     tjerrut+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tjerrujin

#     tjerrut+V+Imprt+Sg2: tjerru          # Check!
#     tjerrut+V+Imprt+Du2: tjerrujehten    # Check!
#     tjerrut+V+Imprt+Pl2: tjerrujihttit   # Check!

     tjerrut+V+ConNeg: tjerru
#     tjerrut+V+GerII: tjerrumin   # Check!
     tjerrut+V+PrfPrc: tjerrum

#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Sg1: tjerrutjav
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Sg2: tjerrutja
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Sg3: tjerrutj
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Du1: tjerrutjin
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Du2: [tjerrutjiehpen, tjerrutjähppen] 
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Du3: tjerrutjiebá
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Pl1: tjerrutjip
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Pl2: tjerrutjihpit
#     tjerrut+V+Pot+Pl3: tjerrutji
